nl: RC-voertuig terreintype: All-terrain; Drift; Offroad; On-road; Rotsklimmen; Zand; Sneeuw; Waterbestendig/natte omstandigheden; Overig
sv: RC-fordons terrängtyp: Allterräng; Drifting; Offroad; Onroad; Rock crawling; Sand; Snö; Vattentålig/våta förhållanden; Övrigt
ko: RC 차량 지형 유형: 전지형; 드리프트; 오프로드; 온로드; 록 크롤링; 모래; 눈; 내수성/습윤 환경; 기타
es: Tipo de terreno para vehículos a control remoto: Todoterreno; Drift; Fuera de carretera; En carretera; Treparrocas; Arena; Nieve; Resistente al agua/condiciones húmedas; Otro
cs: Typ terénu RC vozidla: Terénní; Drift; Off-road; Silniční; Rock crawling; Písek; Sníh; Voděodolné/mokré podmínky; Ostatní
vi: Loại địa hình xe RC: Đa địa hình; Đua drift; Địa hình; Đường nhựa; Leo đá; Cát; Tuyết; Chống nước/Điều kiện ẩm ướt; Khác
th: รูปแบบภูมิประเทศของรถบังคับวิทยุ: ทุกสภาพพื้นผิว; ดริฟต์; ออฟโรด; ทางเรียบ; ไต่หิน; ทราย; หิมะ; ทนน้ำ/สภาพแวดล้อมเปียกชื้น; อื่นๆ
pt-PT: Tipo de terreno do veículo de controlo remoto: Todo-o-terreno; Drift; Off-road; On-road; Rock crawling; Areia; Neve; Resistente à água/condições húmidas; Outro
sl-SI: Vrsta terena za daljinsko vodena vozila: Vse podlage; Drift; Terensko; Cestno; Plezanje po skalah; Pesek; Sneg; Vodoodporno/mokre razmere; Drugo
pt-BR: RC veículo terreno tipo: Todo terreno; Drift; Off-road; On-road; Rock crawling; Areia; Neve; Resistente à água/condições úmidas; Outros
da: RC-køretøjs terræntype: Alt terræn; Drift; Offroad; Onroad; Rock crawling; Sand; Sne; Vandafvisende/våde forhold; Andet
zh-CN: 遥控车地形类型: 全地形; 漂移; 越野; 公路; 攀岩; 沙地; 雪地; 防水/潮湿环境; 其他
nb: Terrengtype for fjernstyrt kjøretøy: Terrenggående; Drifting; Offroad; On-road; Rock crawling; Sand; Snø; Vannbestandig / våte forhold; Annet
en: RC vehicle terrain type: All-terrain; Drift; Off-road; On-road; Rock crawling; Sand; Snow; Water-resistant/wet conditions; Other
bg-BG: Тип терен за RC превозно средство: Всякакви терени; Дрифт; Офроуд; Шосейни; Скали (Rock crawling); Пясък; Сняг; Водоустойчив/мокри условия; Други
lt-LT: RC transporto priemonės reljefo tipas: Skirta visoms dangoms; Šonaslydis; Bekelė; Kelio; Važiavimas uolomis; Smėlis; Sniegas; Atsparus vandeniui / drėgnos sąlygos; Kita
ro-RO: Tipul de teren al vehiculului RC: Tot terenul; Drift; Off-road; On-road; Rock crawling; Nisip; Zăpadă; Rezistent la apă/condiții de umiditate; Altele
el: Τύπος εδάφους για τηλεκατευθυνόμενα οχήματα: Παντός εδάφους; Drift; Εκτός δρόμου; Εντός δρόμου; Αναρρίχηση σε βράχια; Άμμος; Χιόνι; Ανθεκτικό στο νερό / συνθήκες υγρασίας; Άλλο
ru: Тип местности для радиоуправляемого транспортного средства: Вездеходный; Дрифт; Внедорожный; Шоссейный; Краулинг (по скалам); Песок; Снег; Влагозащищенный/для влажных условий; Другое
ja: RC車両の地形タイプ: 全地形対応; ドリフト; オフロード; オンロード; ロッククローリング; 砂地; 雪道; 耐水性/ウェットコンディション; その他
it: Tipo di terreno del veicolo RC: Su tutti i terreni; Da derapata; Fuoristrada; Su strada; Rock crawling; Sabbia; Neve; Resistente all'acqua/condizioni di bagnato; Altro
sk-SK: Typ diaľkovo ovládaného vozidla z hľadiska terénu: Do každého terénu; Driftovanie; Do terénu; Na cestu; Lezenie po skalách; Piesok; Sneh; Odolné voči vode/do mokrých podmienok; Iné
fr: Type de terrain du véhicule radiocommandé: Tout-terrain; Drift; Hors piste; Sur piste; Rock crawling; Sable; Neige; Résistant à l’eau/conditions humides; Autre
zh-TW: 遙控車地形類型: 全地形; 甩尾; 越野; 平路; 攀岩; 沙地; 雪地; 防潑水/潮濕環境; 其他
pl: Typ terenu pojazdu RC: Wieloterenowe; Drift; Off-road; On-road; Rock crawling; Piasek; Śnieg; Wodoodporne / mokre warunki; Inne
de: Geländeart des RC-Fahrzeugs: All-Terrain; Drift; Offroad; Onroad; Rock Crawling; Sand; Schnee; Wasserabweisend/Nässe; Sonstige
fi: Kauko-ohjattavan ajoneuvon käyttömaasto: Kaikki maastot; Drift; Off-road; On-road; Rock crawling; Hiekka; Lumi; Vedenkestävä/märät olosuhteet; Muu
hr-HR: Vrsta terena za RC vozila: Svi tereni; Driftanje; Off-road; Cestovni; Vožnja po stijenama; Pijesak; Snijeg; Vodootporno / mokri uvjeti; Ostalo
hu: RC jármű tereptípusa: Minden tereptípus; Drift; Terep; Országúti; Sziklamászó; Homok; Hó; Vízálló/nedves körülmények; Egyéb
tr: RC araç arazi tipi: Tüm araziler; Drift; Off-road; On-road; Kaya tırmanışı; Kum; Kar; Suya dayanıklı/ıslak koşullar; Diğer